Washington statutes.
RCW 35.94.010

Authority to sell or let.

A city may lease for any term of years or sell and convey any public utility works, plant, or system owned by it or any part thereof, together with all or any equipment and appurtenances thereof.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.94.010. Prior: 1917 c 137 s 1; RRS s 9512. Cf. 1907 c 86 ss 1-3; 1897 c 106 ss 1-4. Formerly RCW 80.48.010.]